Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.063] PROHIBITION ON ADMINISTERING GENE-BASED VACCINES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibition on vaccine administration. new text end new text begin (a) No person shall provide or administer a gene-based vaccine to another person in this state. For purposes of this section, "gene-based vaccine" means a vaccine developed using messenger ribonucleic acid technology, modified messenger ribonucleic acid technology, self-amplifying messenger ribonucleic acid technology, or deoxyribonucleic acid technology. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriate licensing board shall review the license of a person who administers a gene-based vaccine in violation of this section and take appropriate licensing action if the person is found to violate the requirement in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of $500 per incident. new text end